Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1222
Vessel; previously numbered under a federally approved numbering system; registration of number; when.

The owner of any vessel already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it pursuant to then operative federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state shall register the number prior to operating the vessel on the waters of this state in excess of the sixty-day reciprocity period provided for in subdivision (1) of section 37-1249. Such registration shall be in the manner and pursuant to the procedure required for the award of a number under sections 37-1214 to 37-1217.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 22.